src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_et-all_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - n_et-all: #  alla kasus --  kontrollerad av Elina 
    käärmet+N+Sg+Nom: käärmet
    käärmet+N+Sg+Gen: [käärhmeen, käärmheen]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Par: käärmettä
    käärmet+N+Sg+Tra: [käärhmeeksi, käärmheeksi]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Abe: käärmeettä
    käärmet+N+Sg+Ine: [käärhmeessä, käärmheessä]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Ela: [käärhmeestä, käärmheestä]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Ill: [käärhmeesheen, käärmheesheen]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Ade: [käärhmeelä, käärmheelä]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Abl: [käärhmeeltä, käärmheeltä]
    käärmet+N+Sg+All: [käärhmeele, käärmheele]
    käärmet+N+Sg+Ess: [käärhmeenä, käärmheenä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Nom: käärmheet
    käärmet+N+Pl+Gen: [käärmheitten, käärmhejen]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Par: [käärmheitä, käärmhejä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Tra: [käärhmeiksi, käärmheiksi]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Abe: [käärhmeittä, käärmheittä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Ine: [käärhmeissä, käärmheissä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Ela: [käärhmeistä, käärmheistä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Ill: [käärhmeishiin, käärmheishiin]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Ade: [käärhmeilä, käärmheilä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Abl: [käärhmeiltä, käärmheiltä]
    käärmet+N+Pl+All: [käärhmeile, käärmheile]
    käärmet+N+Pl+Ess: [käärhmeinä, käärmheinä]
    
